lexc/adj/enhuadjfnmn.lexc
LEXICON Caseik
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nekválogatott AddNoun;
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoezmid§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig


LEXICON AddAdjat
0:^+cMid§oeoebb§bb Tocase1;  !körkörösebbek nem körkörösebbök!
@U.ART.ABSENT@  Tocaseat;

Lexicon Tocaseat
[stem]+Adj:0     Possat;
[stem]+Adj:0     Plur;
[stem]+Adj:0     Fam;


LEXICON Possat
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Acc:^+cAcc^§AA§t       #;  ! ilyet olyat
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE4a§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE4a§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE4a§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;

LEXICON AddAdjatek
0:^+cMid§oeoebb§bb Tocase1;  !körkörösebbek nem körkörösebbök!
@U.ART.ABSENT@  Tocaseatek;

Lexicon Tocaseatek
[stem]+Adj:0     Possatek;
[stem]+Adj:0     Pluratek;
[stem]+Adj:0     Fam;


LEXICON Possatek
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Acc:^+cAcc^§AA§t       #;  ! ilyet olyat
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE4a§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE4a§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE4a§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;

LEXICON Pluratek
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Gen;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11§k    Gen;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§AA§k    Gen;
                            Gen;

LEXICON AddAdji
0:^+cMid§oeoebb§bb Tocase1;  !körkörösebbek nem körkörösebbök!
@U.ART.ABSENT@  Tocasei;


Lexicon Tocasei
[stem]+Adj:0     Poss;
[stem]+Adj:0     Pluri;
[stem]+Adj:0     Fam;

LEXICON Pluri
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Gen; !o
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11§k    Gen; !a
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoeadjoe§k    Gen; !iek, iak
                            Gen;

LEXICON AddAdjiek
0:^+cMid§oeoebb§bb Tocase1;  !körkörösebbek nem körkörösebbök!
@U.ART.ABSENT@  Tocaseiek;


Lexicon Tocaseiek
[stem]+Adj:0     Poss;
[stem]+Adj:0     Pluriek;
[stem]+Adj:0     Fam;

LEXICON Pluriek
+Plur:^+cPlur^ek    Gen; !o
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Gen; !o
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11§k    Gen; !a
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoeadjoe§k    Gen; !iek, iak
                            Gen;
LEXICON AddAdjI
0:^+cMid§oeoebb§bb Tocase1;  !körkörösebbek nem körkörösebbök!
@U.ART.ABSENT@  TocaseI;


Lexicon TocaseI
[stem]+Adj:0     PossI;
[stem]+Adj:0     PlurI;
[stem]+Adj:0     Fam;


LEXICON PossI
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Acc:^+cAcc^§AA§t       #;  ! ilyet olyat
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE4a§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE4a§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE4a§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;
LEXICON PlurI
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Gen;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11§k    Gen;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoeadjoe§k    Gen; !iek, iak
                            Gen;

LEXICON AddAdjaejaje
0:^+cMid§oeoebb§bb Tocase1;  !körkörösebbek nem körkörösebbök!
@U.ART.ABSENT@  Tocaseaejaje;


Lexicon Tocaseaejaje
[stem]+Adj:0     Possaejaje;
[stem]+Adj:0     Pluraejaje;
[stem]+Adj:0     Fam;


LEXICON Possaejaje
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE4a§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE4a§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§Jnull§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§JJ§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE4a§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§Jnull§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§JJ§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JPnull§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JPnull§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JPnull§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JPnull§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JPnull§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JPnull§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JPJ§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JPJ§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JPJ§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JPJ§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JPJ§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JPJ§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;

LEXICON Pluraejaje
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Gen;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11§k    Gen;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11e§k    Gen;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoeadjoe§k    Gen; !iek, iak
                            Gen;

!result
!legeslegkedvesebbet
!legeslegkedvesebben
!legkedvesebbet
!legkedvesebben
!kedvesebbet
!kedvesebben
!kedveset
!kedvesen

LEXICON Adj3igek
amputálós AddAdjat;
beleegyezéses AddAdjat;
bortermelős AddAdjI;
buggyanós AddAdjat;
cipekedéses AddAdjat;
csekélyítős AddAdjI;
csutakolós AddAdjat;
csörrenős AddAdjI;
diadalmasítós AddAdjat;
dögvészesítéses AddAdjat;
dölyfösítős AddAdjI;
ellenezős AddAdjI;
erőskezűsítéses AddAdjat;
erőskezűsítős AddAdjI;
felekezetieskedős AddAdjI;
fertőződéses AddAdjat;
fosztogatós AddAdjat;
félvezetős AddAdjI;
gazdaságtalanítós AddAdjat;
gebinesítős AddAdjI;
gáncsoskodásos AddAdjat;
görbedős AddAdjI;
hidegfejűsítős AddAdjI;
hullatásos AddAdjat;
ihletős AddAdjI;
jeleskedéses AddAdjat;
kedveltetős AddAdjI;
kevélykedős AddAdjI;
konfidenskedéses AddAdjat;
képviselős AddAdjI;
kötegelős AddAdjI;
kövéredéses AddAdjat;
leplezetlenítős AddAdjI;
majrésodásos AddAdjat;
melegítetlenítős AddAdjI;
mézezős AddAdjI;
naturalisztikusítós AddAdjat;
nyögős AddAdjI;
parabolikusodásos AddAdjat;
permanensítős AddAdjI;
pályázós AddAdjat;
pörsenős AddAdjI;
rezisztensítős AddAdjI;
rámázós AddAdjat;
selejtesülős AddAdjI;
szalonnázásos AddAdjat;
szeleskedős AddAdjI;
szeretgetős AddAdjI;
szégyenlősödéses AddAdjat;
szögelős AddAdjI;
sűrűsödős AddAdjI;
tetterősítős AddAdjI;
tisztításos AddAdjat;
töppedős AddAdjI;
unimodularitásos AddAdjat;
vedelős AddAdjI;
védtelenedős AddAdjI;
vérmesedéses AddAdjat;
zörgetős AddAdjI;
értesülős AddAdjI;
óvásos AddAdjat;
öregszülős AddAdjI;
őszelős AddAdjI;
LEXICON Adj
agyagművességi AddAdjiek;
alperesnyi AddAdji;
alszövetségi AddAdjiek;
amerikanizmusos AddAdjat;
attikaias AddAdjI;
azelőtti AddAdjaejaje;
barnabőrűségi AddAdjiek;
bennfentesi AddAdji;
bilincses AddAdjat;
bronzművességi AddAdjiek;
burgonyaszesznyi AddAdji;
bájnős AddAdjI;
bölcsességi AddAdjiek;
bűnügynyi AddAdji;
citrálos AddAdjat;
csavaroseszűségi AddAdjiek;
csengőnyi AddAdji;
csökkentértékűségi AddAdjiek;
csúcshifi AddAdji;
csőrös AddAdjatek;
diszkontos AddAdjat;
diákszövetségi AddAdjiek;
drótkefei AddAdji;
délelőtti AddAdjaejaje;
egriségi AddAdjiek;
egyezőségi AddAdjiek;
egyszikűs AddAdjI;
elegynyi AddAdji;
eleségi AddAdjiek;
elsőségi AddAdjiek;
előtti AddAdjaejaje;
emberségi AddAdjiek;
eprei AddAdji;
erőgyakorlatos AddAdjat;
eshetőségi AddAdjiek;
ezelőtti AddAdjaejaje;
faluszépei AddAdji;
felelősségi AddAdjiek;
feneségi AddAdjiek;
feszítőnyi AddAdji;
feszültségi AddAdjiek;
forgatagos AddAdjat;
fémművességi AddAdjiek;
fényvisszaverőnyi AddAdji;
férfis AddAdjI;
főszerepi AddAdji;
glukózvérűségi AddAdjiek;
grillázsos AddAdjat;
gyepnyi AddAdji;
gyümölcsös AddAdjatek;
görényi AddAdji;
haszonlesős AddAdjI;
hegységi AddAdjiek;
hennás AddAdjat;
herei AddAdji;
hóvégiségi AddAdjiek;
hőemelkedésnyi AddAdji;
ilyesféleségi AddAdjiek;
inflexiós AddAdjat;
ismertetőnyi AddAdji;
jogias AddAdjI;
jólelkűségi AddAdjiek;
karriernyi AddAdji;
kationos AddAdjat;
kereplőségi AddAdjiek;
kerthelyiségnyi AddAdji;
kintlevőségi AddAdjiek;
kolesznyi AddAdji;
kormánytanácsos AddAdjat;
kultúrközösségi AddAdjiek;
képviselői AddAdji;
kérődzős AddAdjI;
költőiségi AddAdjiek;
köpenyi AddAdji;
különbségi AddAdjiek;
küszöbi AddAdji;
kőkrisztusos AddAdjat;
lámpafénnyi AddAdji;
lövérekbeliségi AddAdjiek;
manipulátoros AddAdjat;
matematikaias AddAdjI;
materi AddAdji;
mennyiségi AddAdjiek;
mini AddAdji;
májbetegségi AddAdjiek;
mérműves AddAdjat;
nagyapinyi AddAdji;
nagyétkűségi AddAdjiek;
nyakmerevségi AddAdjiek;
nyergei AddAdji;
offenzívségi AddAdjiek;
olajágas AddAdjI;
oldalfényes AddAdjat;
paralleli AddAdji;
piruettnyi AddAdji;
plutóniumos AddAdjat;
progresszívségi AddAdjiek;
póttörvényi AddAdji;
refektóriumos AddAdjat;
rei AddAdji;
reklámfőnökségi AddAdjiek;
repülőfedélzetnyi AddAdji;
rosszlelkűs AddAdjI;
rétegzettségi AddAdjiek;
röfinyi AddAdji;
smirgli AddAdji;
sorsos AddAdjat;
szabadszórendűségi AddAdjiek;
szellemnyi AddAdji;
szexinyi AddAdji;
szponzorációs AddAdjat;
számvevőségi AddAdjiek;
színésznős AddAdjI;
szódavíznyi AddAdji;
sötétszőkésségi AddAdjiek;
süllőnyi AddAdji;
tavalyelőtti AddAdjaejaje;
tegnapelőtti AddAdjaejaje;
teines AddAdjat;
tenyészszemlei AddAdji;
területenkívüliségi AddAdjiek;
totemi AddAdji;
tölgyfagubacsos AddAdjat;
tönkretehetőségi AddAdjiek;
törlőkendős AddAdjI;
törtrésznyi AddAdji;
vegyifülkényi AddAdji;
vendéglőhelyiségi AddAdjiek;
vihetőségi AddAdjiek;
vizi AddAdji;
vályogos AddAdjat;
vízibetegségi AddAdjiek;
zenedényi AddAdji;
ágyékkötős AddAdjI;
árveszteségi AddAdjiek;
árvédelmei AddAdji;
élőfás AddAdjat;
értesítvénnyi AddAdji;
ínyesmesterségi AddAdjiek;
öregszülei AddAdji;
ötvenedikségi AddAdjiek;
ütőérnyi AddAdji;
őgyelgőségi AddAdjiek;
